Maryland, session 2026, HB1206.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1206*

HOUSE BILL 1206
2.5–106.
The Department shall:
(18) work with community colleges to enhance the role of community
colleges in providing workforce training services, including industry–specific education and
training in response to the needs of the State; [and]
(19) (i) define, identify, and compile data on State and regional
workforce needs; and
(ii) work collaboratively with the Maryland Department of Labor
and the Maryland Higher Education Commission to produce uniform and consistent
baseline data, including common sources and measurements, about workforce needs to
inform State policies relating to postsecondary education; AND
(20) COLLABORATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OF SOCIAL AND
ECONOMIC MOBILITY TO ESTABLISH THE DBE REEVALUATION ASSISTANCE
PROGRAM UNDER § 9–4103(C) OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE.
Article – State Government
9–4103.
(a) The purpose of the Department is to:
(1) provide support for units of State government, individuals, and
businesses for the maintenance of social equity policies in the State;
(2) monitor trends in social equity programs and policies across the nation;
(3) propose new and innovative approaches to social equity programs;
(4) compile and produce reports and recommendations related to social
equity;
(5) ensure the fulfillment of the roles and responsibilities of the entities
and social equity programs in the State for which it is the successor;
(6) track the performance of social equity programs and small or
disadvantaged business assistance programs;
(7) promote and encourage full participation in the regulated cannabis
industry by individuals from communities that have previously been disproportionately
impacted by the war on drugs in order to positively impact those communities and other
duties assigned to the Office of Social Equity established under this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1206 3
(8) support small or disadvantaged businesses in the State through all
duties assigned to the [Governor’s] Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs;
and
(9) carry out the duties of the Office of Minority Business Enterprises
within the Maryland Department of Transportation, including duties assigned to support
small or disadvantaged businesses.
(b) The Department shall:
(1) connect a person with programs in State, federal, and local government
that serve designated populations to ensure the person is connected to programs and other
opportunities the person is eligible for;
(2) provide units of State government with assistance related to the
purpose of the Department by:
(i) facilitating information sharing between units;
(ii) maintaining an inventory of social equity work performed by
each unit and relevant reports from those units;
(iii) conducting policy analyses on social equity and the effectiveness
of social equity programs;
(iv) adopting standards for units to promote social equity; and
(v) providing technical assistance to units; and
(3) adopt regulations to carry out this subtitle.
(C) (1) (I) IN THIS SUBSECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE
MEANINGS INDICATED.
(II) “ELIGIBLE BUSINESS” MEANS A MARYLAND–BASED
BUSINESS THAT:
1. WAS CERTIFIED AS A DISADVANTAGED BUSINESS
ENTERPRISE BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT ON OCTOBER 3, 2025; AND
2. A. HAS BEEN NOTIFIED THAT IT MUST UNDERGO
REEVALUATION; OR
B. HAS APPLIED FOR RECERTIFICATION AFTER A
REEVALUATION DENIAL.

HOUSE BILL 1206
(III) “PROGRAM” MEANS THE DBE REEVALUATION
ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2026, IN COLLABORATION WITH
THE DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ESTABLISH THE DBE
REEVALUATION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM.
(3) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING
SERVICES TO ELIGIBLE BUSINESSES:
(I) APPLICATION PREPARATION ASSISTANCE;
(II) FINANCIAL DOCUMENTATION ASSISTANCE;
(III) OWNERSHIP AND CONTROL DOCUMENTATION REVIEW;
(IV) NARRATIVE AND AFFIDAVIT PREPARATION;
(V) LEGAL STRUCTURE COMPLIANCE GUIDANCE;
(VI) PRE–SUBMISSION APPLICATION REVIEW FOR
COMPLETENESS; AND
(VII) ADMINISTRATION APPEAL SUPPORT THAT DOES NOT
INCLUDE LEGAL ASSISTANCE.
(4) THE PROGRAM MAY PROVIDE THE SERVICES LISTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION:
(I) DIRECTLY; OR
(II) THROUGH AGREEMENTS WITH THIRD PARTIES, INCLUDING:
1. SMALL BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT CENTERS;
2. CLINICS OPERATED BY LAW SCHOOLS OR BUSINESS
SCHOOLS;
3. NONPROFIT BUSINESS SUPPORT ORGANIZATIONS;
AND
4. PROVIDERS OF ACCOUNTING OR LEGAL ASSISTANCE.

HOUSE BILL 1206 5
(5) THE PROGRAM SHALL IDENTIFY OPPORTUNITIES TO INCREASE
OUTREACH TO ELIGIBLE BUSINESSES AND MAXIMIZE THE PROVISION OF SERVICES
TO ELIGIBLE BUSINESSES, INCLUDING BY HOSTING CLINICS, WORKSHOPS, AND
ONE–ON–ONE TECHNICAL ASSISTANCE.
(6) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 31, 2027, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THIS
ARTICLE, THE SENATE BUDGET AND TAXATION COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE
GOVERNMENT, LABOR, AND ELECTIONS COMMITTEE ON:
(I) THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE FIRMS SERVED BY THE
PROGRAM;
(II) THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE FIRMS SERVED BY THE
PROGRAM THAT COMPLETED SUCCESSFUL REEVALUATIONS UNDER THE FEDERAL
DISADVANTAGED BUSINESS ENTERPRISE PROGRAM; AND
(III) AN ESTIMATE OF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF FEDERAL
FUNDING PRESERVED BY THE PROGRAM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and, at the end of June 30, 2028,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.